Oklahoma, session 2025, SB275.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2904 of Title 74, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. There is hereby created on January 1, 2026, to continue
until December 30, 2035, the Oklahoma Workforce Housing Commission.
The Commission shall be composed of fifteen (15) members. The
members shall serve as follows:
1. Five members shall be appointed by the Governor:
a. one shall be a person living in an urban area with a
population more than seventy-five thousand (75,000)

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB275 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

persons according to the latest Federal Decennial
Census,
b. one shall be a person living in a rural community in a
county with a population less than seventy-five
thousand (75,000) persons according to the latest
Federal Decennial Census,
c. one shall be an official serving in a city, town, or
political subdivision in a county with a population
less than seventy-five thousand (75,000) persons
according to the latest Federal Decennial Census,
d. one shall represent an organization that assists
special populations, including, but not limited to,
the elderly, the disabled, veterans, and children
transitioning out of foster care, in obtaining
affordable housing, and
e. one shall represent an Oklahoma rural housing
authority;
2. Five members shall be appointed by the President Pro Tempore
of the Senate:
a. one shall be a Senator from the majority party who
shall serve as co-chair of the Commission,
b. one shall be a Senator from the minority party who
shall serve as co-vice chair of the Commission,

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB275 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

c. one shall represent a low-income and moderate-to-low-
income population-serving financial institution or a
community development financial institution, as
defined by the Federal Reserve,
d. one shall be an official serving in a municipality
with a population more than seventy-five thousand
(75,000) persons according to the latest Federal
Decennial Census, and
e. one shall represent an urban housing authority;
3. Five members shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House
of Representatives:
a. one shall be a Representative from the majority party
who shall serve as co-chair of the Commission,
b. one shall be a Representative from the minority party
who shall serve as co-vice chair of the Commission,
c. one shall represent a federally recognized tribe in
Oklahoma that develops housing in rural areas,
d. one shall be a representative from a community housing
development organization, and
e. one shall represent a not-for-profit organization that
serves low-income Oklahomans experiencing difficulty
in obtaining affordable housing; and
4. The following shall be ex officio members:

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB275 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

a. a representative from the Oklahoma Housing Finance
Agency representing statewide housing programs,
b. an Oklahoma representative of the United States
Department of Agriculture, and
c. the Chief Executive Officer of the Oklahoma Workforce
Commission, or his or her designee.
B. Eight members shall constitute a quorum, and the vote of the
majority of members present shall be necessary for any action to be
taken by the Commission.
C. For the initial appointments of members to the Commission,
each appointment shall be for a two-year term. Thereafter, the
terms of the Commission shall be for three (3) years.
D. No member of the Commission shall receive a salary or
reimbursement for duties performed as a member of the Commission.
E. The Commission shall serve as the primary coordinating body
for addressing the needs of workers at all income levels by
advancing suitable housing in the state to facilitate community
economic growth.
F. The meetings of the Commission shall be subject to the
Oklahoma Open Meeting Act and the Oklahoma Open Records Act.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2904.1 of Title 74, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB275 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

The Oklahoma Workforce Commission shall promulgate rules
relating to:
1. An initial comprehensive Oklahoma workforce housing
environmental scan and needs assessment;
2. A comprehensive Oklahoma housing annual report and action
plan to be submitted electronically to the Governor and the
Legislature and made available on the Commission website;
3. A state plan for long-term expansion of workforce and
affordable housing across the state;
4. A review of the implementation and outcomes of the
investment in the Oklahoma Housing Stability Program created in
Section 2903 et seq. of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
5. An evaluation to make recommendations to the Legislature on
policies and incentives to increase the development, inventory, and
diversification of housing stock to meet demand for economic
development across the state; and
6. Any other rules necessary to carry out the purpose and
mission of the Oklahoma Workforce Housing Commission pursuant to
Section 1 of this act.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT, WORKFORCE
AND TOURISM
March 4, 2025 - DO PASS AS AMENDED BY CS


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB275 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)